Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF591.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.211, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2b. new text end new text begin License recognition for nurses licensed under the Nurse Licensure Compact during a peacetime emergency. new text end new text begin (a) As used in this subdivision, "out-of-state nurse" means a nurse who: new text end new text begin (1) holds a multistate license under the Nurse Licensure Compact; and new text end new text begin (2) is not licensed to practice nursing in Minnesota by the board. new text end new text begin (b) An out-of-state nurse may practice nursing in Minnesota during a peacetime emergency declared under section 12.31, subdivision 2, when the peacetime emergency addresses a health emergency that requires the assistance of additional nurses. new text end new text begin (c) When practicing nursing under this subdivision, an out-of-state nurse's license has the same force and effect as if issued by the board. new text end new text begin (d) Before practicing nursing under this subdivision, an out-of-state nurse must be under contract or provider agreement with a health care system or provider located in Minnesota, such as a hospital, clinic, or other health care entity. new text end new text begin (e) A health care system or provider that is under contract or provider agreement with an out-of-state nurse under this subdivision must: new text end new text begin (1) verify that the nurse holds a multistate license under the Nurse Licensure Compact that is in good standing; and new text end new text begin (2) file a report with the commissioner of health that includes the number of out-of-state nurses under contract or provider agreement under this subdivision and the length of each nurse's contract or provider agreement. The report must be filed with the commissioner no later than 60 days after the peacetime emergency referenced in paragraph (b) ends. new text end new text begin (f) By practicing nursing under this subdivision, an out-of-state nurse submits to the jurisdiction of the board. The board may revoke the authorization provided by this subdivision from an out-of-state nurse under the board's jurisdiction. Upon revocation, an out-of-state nurse must immediately cease practicing nursing under this subdivision. new text end new text begin (g) This subdivision expires if Minnesota joins the Nurse Licensure Compact. The board must notify the revisor of statutes if Minnesota joins the Nurse Licensure Compact. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.211, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2c. new text end new text begin License recognition for nurses licensed under the Nurse Licensure Compact during a pandemic or localized disease outbreak. new text end new text begin (a) As used in this subdivision, "out-of-state nurse" means a nurse who: new text end new text begin (1) holds a multistate license under the Nurse Licensure Compact; and new text end new text begin (2) is not licensed to practice nursing in Minnesota by the board. new text end new text begin (b) An out-of-state nurse may practice nursing in Minnesota when a pandemic or localized disease outbreak impacts the staffing of a health care system or provider to a critical level. The commissioner of health shall determine whether a pandemic or localized disease outbreak impacts the staffing of a health care system or provider to a critical level upon request from a health care system or provider in the form and manner determined by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (c) When practicing nursing under this subdivision, an out-of-state nurse's license has the same force and effect as if issued by the board. new text end new text begin (d) Before practicing nursing under this subdivision, an out-of-state nurse must be under contract or provider agreement with a health care system or provider located in Minnesota, such as a hospital, clinic, or other health care entity. new text end new text begin (e) A health care system or provider that is under contract or provider agreement with an out-of-state nurse under this subdivision must: new text end new text begin (1) verify that the nurse holds a multistate license under the Nurse Licensure Compact that is in good standing; and new text end new text begin (2) file a report with the commissioner of health that includes the number of out-of-state nurses under contract or provider agreement under this subdivision and the length of each nurse's contract or provider agreement. The report must be filed with the commissioner no later than 60 days after the commissioner notifies the health care system or provider that the pandemic or localized disease outbreak referenced in paragraph (b) has ended. new text end new text begin (f) By practicing nursing under this subdivision, an out-of-state nurse submits to the jurisdiction of the board. The board may revoke the authorization provided by this subdivision from an out-of-state nurse under the board's jurisdiction. Upon revocation, an out-of-state nurse must immediately cease practicing nursing under this subdivision. new text end new text begin (g) This subdivision expires if Minnesota joins the Nurse Licensure Compact. The board must notify the revisor of statutes if Minnesota joins the Nurse Licensure Compact. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end